apertium-mfe-en.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>

<dictionary>
	
	<alphabet>ABCČĆDDžĐEFGHIJKLLjMNNjOPRSŠTUVZŽabcčćddžđefghijklljmnnjoprsštuvzž</alphabet>
	
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="alpha" c=""/> 
		<sdef n="acr" c="Acronym"/> 
		<sdef n="predet" c="Pre determiner"/> 
		<sdef n="detnt" c="Neuter dererminer"/> 
		<sdef n="top" c="Toponym"/> 
		<sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym"/> 
		<sdef n="al" c="Alters"/> 
		<sdef n="cog" c="Cognomen"/> 
		<sdef n="atn" /> 
		<sdef n="enc" /> 
		<sdef n="pro" /> 
		<sdef n="tn" /> 
		<sdef n="n" /> 
		<sdef n="np" /> 
		<sdef n="adj" /> 
		<sdef n="f" /> 
		<sdef n="m" /> 
		<sdef n="mf" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="pl" /> 
		<sdef n="adv" /> 
		<sdef n="preadv" /> 
		<sdef n="pr" /> 
		<sdef n="prn" /> 
		<sdef n="rel" /> 
		<sdef n="nn" /> 
		<sdef n="an" /> 
		<sdef n="aa" /> 
		<sdef n="ind" /> 
		<sdef n="itg" /> 
		<sdef n="det" /> 
		<sdef n="dem" /> 
		<sdef n="def" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
		<sdef n="nt" /> 
		<sdef n="vbser" /> 
		<sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
		<sdef n="vblex" /> 
		<sdef n="vbmod" /> 
		<sdef n="inf" /> 
		<sdef n="ger" /> 
		<sdef n="pp" /> 
		<sdef n="p1" /> 
		<sdef n="p2" /> 
		<sdef n="p3" /> 
		<sdef n="pii" /> 
		<sdef n="ifi" /> 
		<sdef n="fti" /> 
		<sdef n="cni" /> 
		<sdef n="prs" /> 
		<sdef n="pis" /> 
		<sdef n="fts" /> 
		<sdef n="imp" /> 
		<sdef n="pos" /> 
		<sdef n="sp" /> 
		<sdef n="ref" /> 
		<sdef n="sup" /> 
		<sdef n="ord" /> 
		<sdef n="qnt" /> 
		<sdef n="num" /> 
		<sdef n="pron" /> 
		<sdef n="ij" /> 
		<sdef n="sent" /> 
		<sdef n="cm" /> 
		<sdef n="lpar" /> 
		<sdef n="rpar" /> 
		<sdef n="web" /> 
		<sdef n="apos" /> 
		<sdef n="percent" /> 
		<sdef n="guio" /> 
		<sdef n="past" /> 
		<sdef n="sep" /> 
		<sdef n="sint" /> 
		<sdef n="email" /> 
		<sdef n="obj" /> 
		<sdef n="subj" /> 
		<sdef n="subs" /> 
		<sdef n="pprs" /> 
		<sdef n="url" /> 
		<sdef n="gen" /> 
		<sdef n="vbdo" /> 
		<sdef n="comp" /> 
		<sdef n="pres" /> 
		<sdef n="vaux" /> 
		<sdef n="sym" /> 
		<sdef n="ND" /> 
		<sdef n="GD" /> 
  	</sdefs>
	
	<pardefs>
		
		<pardef n="/be__vbser">
			<e><p><l>be</l><r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>are</l> <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>am</l><r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>is</l><r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>was</l><r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>was</l><r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>were</l><r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>been</l><r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>being</l><r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="/eat__vblex">
			<e><p><l>eat</l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>eat</l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>eats</l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ate</l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>eaten</l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>eating</l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="/a__det">
			<e r="RL"><p><l><a/>a</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>an</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="accept__vblex">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ing</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="after__cnjadv">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="all__predet">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="predet"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
			<!--
				<e r="RL"><p><l/><r><s n="predet"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
				<e r="RL"><p><l/><r><s n="predet"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			-->
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="all__prn">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="and__cnjcoo">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="approach__vblex">
			<!--
				<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
			-->
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ed</l> <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ing</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="at__pr">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="bab/y__n">
			<e><p><l>y</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ies</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>ys</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>ies'</l> <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>ys'</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="BBC__n">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="bass__n">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>es'</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n = "big/__adj">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n = "adj"/><s n = "sint"/></r></p></e>
      		<e><p><l>ger</l><r><s n = "adj"/><s n = "sint"/><s n = "comp"/></r></p></e>
      		<e><p><l>gest</l><r><s n = "adj"/><s n = "sint"/><s n = "sup"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="both__prn">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="c/an__vbmod">
			<e><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="RL"><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ould</l><r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="cut__vblex">
			<e><p><l>ting</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="enough__det">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="expensive__adj">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="f/ind__vblex">
			<e><p><l>inding</l><r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ound</l><r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ound</l><r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ind</l><r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>inds</l><r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="glad/__adj">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>der</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>dest</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		

  		<e lm="a"><i></i><par n="/a__det"/></e>
  		<e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
  		<e lm="agricultural"><i>agricultural</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="and"><i>and</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
  		<e lm="all"><i>all</i><par n="all__predet"/></e>
  		<e lm="all"><i>all</i><par n="all__prn"/></e>
  		<e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
  		<e lm="be"><par n="/be__vbser"/></e>
  		<e lm="because of"><i>because<b/>of</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
  		<e lm="but"><i>but</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
  		<e lm="but"><i>but</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
  		<e lm="by"><i>by</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
  		<e lm="can"><i>c</i><par n="c/an__vbmod"/></e>
  		<e lm="century"><i>centur</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="consist"><i>consist</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="contrary"><i>contrary</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="cover"><i>cover</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="cut"><i>cut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="different"><i>different</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="during"><i>during</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
  		<e lm="eat"><par n="/eat__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="find"><i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="fish"><i>fish</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="flaming"><i>flaming</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="found"><i>found</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="for"><i>for</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
  		<e lm="for"><i>for</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
  		<e lm="import"><i>import</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
  		<e lm="interesting"><i>interesting</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
	  	<e lm="left"><i>left</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="like"><i>like</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
  		<e lm="main"><i>main</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="mention"><i>mention</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="more"><i>more</i><par n="enough__det"/></e>
		<e lm="ND"><i>ND</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="of"><i>of</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
	  	<e lm="original"><i>original</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="plant"><i>plant</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="red"><i>red</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="some"><i>some</i><par n="enough__det"/></e>
  		<e lm="some"><i>some</i><par n="both__prn"/></e>
  		<e lm="than"><i>than</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
  		<e lm="to"><i>to</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
  		<e lm="variety"><i>variet</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="watch"><i>watch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="with"><i>with</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
  		<e lm="wonderful"><i>wonderful</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="world"><i>world</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
